Utah statutes.
13-5-14.   Injunctive relief -- Damages -- Immunity.

Any person or the state of Utah may maintain an action to enjoin a continuance of any act in violation of this chapter, and, if injured by the act, for the recovery of damages. If, in such action, the court finds that the defendant is violating or has violated any of the provisions of this chapter, it shall enjoin the defendant from a continuance of the violation. It is not necessary that actual damages to the plaintiff be alleged or proved. In addition to such injunctive relief, the plaintiff is entitled to recover from the defendant three times the amount of the actual damages sustained or $2,000, whichever is greater, plus court costs.

Any defendant in an action brought under this section may be required to testify. The books and records of such defendant may be brought into court and introduced, by reference, into evidence. No information so obtained may be used against the defendant as a basis for a misdemeanor prosecution under this chapter.

